California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) If, upon summary investigation, it appears probable to the director that a violation of this chapter, or the regulations thereunder, has occurred, the director, in their discretion, may suggest measures that in the director’s judgment would compensate the complainant for the damages they suffered as a result of the alleged violation. If the service dealer or service contractor accepts the director’s suggestions and performs accordingly, the director shall give that fact due consideration in any subsequent disciplinary proceeding. If the service dealer or service contractor declines to abide by the suggestions of the director, the director may investigate further and may institute disciplinary proceedings in accordance with the provisions
 of this chapter.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 91) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 23.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 24 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

9863.

(a) If, upon summary investigation, it appears probable to the director that a violation of this chapter, or the regulations thereunder, has occurred, the director, in their discretion, may suggest measures that in the director’s judgment would compensate the complainant for the damages they suffered as a result of the alleged violation. If the service dealer accepts the director’s suggestions and performs accordingly, the director shall give that fact due consideration in any subsequent disciplinary proceeding. If the service dealer declines to abide by the suggestions of the director, the director may investigate further and may institute disciplinary proceedings in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 92) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 24.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue [9870. - 9874.5.]

9870.

All fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Household Goods and Services Fund, which fund is hereby created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 25.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9871.

The director shall report to the State Controller at the beginning of each month, for the month preceding, the amount and source of all revenue received by the bureau pursuant to this chapter, and at that time shall pay the entire amount thereof into the State Treasury for credit to the Household Goods and Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 26.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9872.

The money in the Household Goods and Services Fund necessary for the administration of the bureau and the administration of this chapter shall be used for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 27.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9873.

The fees prescribed by this chapter shall be set by the director by regulation, according to the following schedule:

(a) (1) The initial registration fee for an electronic repair industry service dealer or for an appliance repair industry service dealer is not more than two hundred five dollars ($205) for each place of business in this state. The initial registration fee for a service contractor is not more than ninety-five dollars ($95) for each place of business in this state.

(2) The initial registration fee for a person who engages in business as both an electronic repair industry service dealer and an appliance repair
 industry service dealer is not more than four hundred five dollars ($405) for each place of business in this state. The initial registration fee for a person who is a service contractor and engages in business as either an electronic repair industry service dealer or an appliance repair industry service dealer is not more than three hundred dollars ($300) for each place of business in this state.

(3) The initial registration fee for a person who engages in both the electronic repair industry and the appliance repair industry as a service dealer and is a service contractor is not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each place of business in this state.

(4) A service dealer or service contractor who does not operate a place of business in this state, but engages in the electronic
 repair industry or the appliance repair industry, or sells, issues, or administers service contracts in this state, shall pay the registration fee specified herein as if that service dealer or service contractor had a place of business in this state.

(b) (1) The annual registration renewal fee for an electronic repair industry service dealer or for an appliance repair industry service dealer is not more than two hundred five dollars ($205) for each place of business in this state, if renewed prior to its expiration date. The annual registration renewal fee for a service contractor is ninety-five dollars ($95) for each place of business in this state, if renewed prior to its expiration date.

(2) The annual renewal fee for a service dealer who engages in the
 business as both an electronic repair industry service dealer and an appliance repair industry service dealer is not more than four hundred dollars ($400) for each place of business in this state.

(3) The annual renewal fee for a service dealer who engages in the electronic repair industry and the appliance repair industry and is a service contractor is not more than four hundred seventy-five dollars ($475) for each place of business in this state.

(4) A service dealer or service contractor who does not operate a place of business in this state, but who engages in the electronic repair industry or the appliance repair industry, or sells or issues service contracts in this state, shall pay the renewal fee specified herein as if that service dealer or service contractor had a place of business
 in this state.

(c) The delinquency fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee for a license in effect on the date of renewal of the license, except as otherwise provided in Section 163.5.

(d) 
 This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 93) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 28.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 29 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 508.)
-------------------------------------------

9873.

The fees prescribed by this chapter shall be set by the director by regulation, according to the following schedule:

(a) The initial registration fee for an electronic repair industry service dealer or for an appliance repair industry service dealer is not more than two hundred five dollars ($205) for each place of business in this state. The initial registration fee for a person who engages in business as both an electronic repair industry service dealer and an appliance repair industry service dealer is not more than four hundred five dollars ($405).

(b) The annual registration renewal fee for an electronic repair industry service dealer or for
 an appliance repair industry service dealer is not more than two hundred five dollars ($205) for each place of business in this state, if renewed prior to its expiration date. The annual renewal fee for a service dealer who engages in the business as both an electronic repair industry service dealer and an appliance repair industry service dealer is not more than four hundred dollars ($400).

(c) The delinquency fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee for a license in effect on the date of renewal of the license, except as otherwise provided in Section 163.5.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 94) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 29.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9874.

All salaries, expenses, or costs incurred or sustained pursuant to this chapter shall be payable only out of the Household Goods and Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 30.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9874.5.

(a) All moneys in the Electronic and Appliance Repair Fund shall be transferred to the Household Goods and Services Fund by July 1, 2026. On July 1, 2026, the Electronic and Appliance Repair Fund shall be abolished.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31,
 2026, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 508, Sec. 31.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of December 31, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 20.1. Motor Vehicle Replacement Parts [9875. - 9875.2.]

9875.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Insurer” includes an insurance company and any person authorized to represent the insurer with respect to a claim.

(b) “Aftermarket crash part” means a replacement for any of the nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts which generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle, including inner and outer panels.

(c) “Nonoriginal equipment manufacturer (Non-OEM) aftermarket crash part” means aftermarket crash parts not made for or by the manufacturer of the motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 817, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9875.1.

No insurer shall require the use of nonoriginal equipment manufacturer aftermarket crash parts in the repair of an insured’s motor vehicle, unless the consumer is advised in a written estimate of the use of nonoriginal equipment manufacturer aftermarket crash parts before repairs are made. In all instances where nonoriginal equipment manufacturer aftermarket crash parts are intended for use by an insurer:

(a) The written estimate shall clearly identify each such part with the name of its nonoriginal equipment manufacturer or distributor.

(b) A disclosure document containing the following information in 10-point type or larger type shall be attached to the insured’s copy of the estimate: “This estimate has been prepared based on the use of crash parts supplied by a source other than the manufacturer of your motor vehicle. Any warranties applicable to these replacement parts are provided by the manufacturer or distributor of the parts, rather than by the original manufacturer of your vehicle.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 817, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9875.2.

Any violation of this chapter shall be enforced by the penalties provided in Section 790.06 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 817, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 20.3. Automotive Repair [9880. - 9889.68.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [9880. - 9880.5.]

9880.

This chapter constitutes the chapter on automotive repair dealers. It may be cited as the Automotive Repair Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9880.1.

The following definitions apply for the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Automotive repair dealer” means a person who, for compensation, engages in the business of repairing or diagnosing malfunctions of motor vehicles, or engages in the business of collecting compensation for automotive repair services that are referred or sublet to someone other than the dealer or their employees.

(b) “Automotive technician” means an employee of an automotive repair dealer or that dealer, if the employer or dealer repairs motor vehicles and who, for salary or wage, performs repairs of motor vehicles as set forth in subdivision (k).

(c) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Automotive Repair.

(d) “Chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Automotive Repair.

(e) “Commercial business agreement” means an agreement, whether in writing or oral, entered into between a business or commercial enterprise and an automotive repair dealer, prior to the repair that is requested to be made, that contemplates a continuing business arrangement under which the automotive repair dealer is to repair any motor vehicle covered by the agreement, but does not mean any warranty or extended service agreement normally given by an automotive repair facility to its customers.

(f) “Customer” means the person
 presenting a motor vehicle for repair and authorizing the repairs to that motor vehicle. “Customer” shall not mean the automotive repair dealer providing the repair services or an insurer involved in a claim that includes the motor vehicle being repaired or an employee or agent or a person acting on behalf of the dealer or insurer.

(g) “Director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(h) “Motor vehicle” means a passenger vehicle required to be registered with the Department of Motor Vehicles and all motorcycles whether or not required to be registered by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(i) “Person” includes a firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, participating tribe, or corporation.

(j) “Preventative maintenance services” means the following maintenance services: checking tire pressure and adding or relieving pressure, as necessary; rotating tires; changing transmission fluid, transmission filter, engine oil and filter, differential fluid, power steering fluid, and transfer case fluid; changing engine or cabin air filters, and external fuel filters; changing engine coolant; performing a fuel system induction service; replacing belts and windshield wiper blades; replacing light bulbs and restoring headlamps; adding oil or fuel treatments through the designated fill points; and topping off fluids; and all of the listed services include the removal, reinstallation, and replacement of any components necessary to perform each service, and the tapping of damaged threads without removal of any fluid pan.

(k) “Repair of motor vehicles” means all maintenance of and repairs to motor vehicles performed by an automotive repair dealer, including automotive body repair work, but excluding those repairs made pursuant to a commercial business agreement and roadside
 services.

(l) “Roadside services” means the services performed upon a motor vehicle for the purpose of transporting the vehicle or to permit it to be operated under its own power, by, or on behalf of, a motor club holding a certificate of authority pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12160) of Part 5 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, or by an operator of a tow truck, as defined in Section 615 of the Vehicle Code, that is owned or operated by a person or entity who possesses a valid motor carrier permit, as described in Section 34620 of the Vehicle Code, and is enrolled in the Basic Inspection of Terminals program, as described in Section 34501.12 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 21.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9880.2.

The following persons are exempt from the requirement of registration:

(a) An employee of an automotive repair dealer if the employee repairs motor vehicles only as an employee.

(b) A person who solely engages in the business of repairing the motor vehicles of one or more commercial, industrial, or governmental establishments.

(c) A person who is registered pursuant to Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 9800) and whose work is limited to the installation or replacement of a motor vehicle radio, antenna, audio recorder, audio playback equipment, ignition interlock device, or
 burglar alarm.

(d) A person whose primary business is the wholesale supply of new or rebuilt automotive parts who solely engages in the remachining of individual automotive parts without compensation for warranty adjustments to those parts and who does not engage in repairing or diagnosing malfunctions of motor vehicles or motorcycles. “Primary business” means the business that accounts for the majority of the company’s gross sales. “Wholesale supply” means the sale, by a seller who possesses a California Resale Permit, of automotive parts to a retailer or jobber for the purpose of resale. However, a person described in this subdivision, prior to commencing work, shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide a notice containing the bureau’s toll-free telephone number to the customer that the person is not regulated by the bureau.

(2) Provide a written description of the remachining services to be performed to the customer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 16.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9880.3.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Bureau of Automotive Repair in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9880.4.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Bureau of Automotive Repair established the BAR Advisory Group to increase the level of communication between the bureau, the automotive repair industry, education providers, consumers, and other stakeholders. The advisory group meets quarterly to provide input to the chief on bureau and other state regulatory programs.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the bureau continues to maintain a group of volunteer representatives to advise the bureau on regulatory issues and programs affecting the automotive repair industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 3.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9880.5.

(a) As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Federally recognized tribe” means a tribe located in this state and included on the list published in the Federal Register pursuant to the Federally Recognized Indian Tribe List Act of 1994 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 5131) and includes an entity controlled by and established for the benefit of one or more tribes.

(2) “Participating tribe” means a federally recognized tribe that formally applies for licensure from the bureau pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The bureau shall license a
 federally recognized tribe that applies for licensure and is otherwise compliant with this chapter for the purpose of engaging in a business regulated by this chapter.

(c) Nothing in this chapter is intended to infringe upon or diminish the existing rights, privileges, and immunities of federally recognized tribes as set forth in federal, state, or tribal law, or the jurisdiction of those participating tribes.

(d) Nothing in this chapter, whether express or implied, shall confer upon the bureau or director any rights or authority to regulate any activity within the jurisdiction of a participating tribe.

(e) Any requirement to register with the Secretary of State, maintain good standing with the Secretary of State, provide a corporate
 number issued by the Secretary of State, or any other associated requirement shall not apply to a participating tribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 22.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [9882. - 9882.14.]

9882.

(a) (1) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Bureau of Automotive Repair under the supervision and control of the director. The duty of enforcing and administering this chapter is vested in the chief who is responsible to the director. The director may adopt and enforce those rules and regulations that the director determines are reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and declare the policy of the bureau, including a system for the issuance of citations for violations of this chapter as specified in Section 125.9.

(2) (A) On or after July 1, 2023, the director may include in the citation system a process for informal
 review of and recommendation on citations, including establishment of an informal citation conference conducted by a panel of independent representatives appointed by the chief. The informal citation conference panel shall consist of three members, with one representative each from the bureau, the public, and the automotive repair industry.

(B) (i) The director may include in the citation system a process for an automotive repair dealer, upon successful completion of remedial training conducted by a provider certified pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 9884.7, to prevent disclosure of the citation on the internet as provided in Section 27.

(ii) To be eligible for citation nondisclosure under this subparagraph, the automotive repair dealer shall not have
 attended remedial training in the prior 18-month period from the effective date of citation.

(iii) Any employee of the automotive repair dealer who was involved in the violation resulting in the bureau’s issuance of the citation also may be required by the bureau to attend remedial training with the automotive repair dealer to prevent disclosure of the citation.

(3) Rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this article and under the Automotive Repair Act, shall be subject to review
 by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. In that review, the bureau shall have the burden of demonstrating a compelling public need for the continued existence of the bureau and its regulatory program, and that its function is the least restrictive regulation consistent with the public health, safety, and welfare.

(c) This section shall be effective only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 786.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.

(a) (1) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Bureau of Automotive Repair under the supervision and control of the director. The duty of enforcing and administering this chapter is vested in the chief who is responsible to the director. The director may adopt and enforce those rules and regulations that the director determines are reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and declare the policy of the bureau, including a system for the issuance of citations for violations of this chapter as specified in Section 125.9.

(2) The director may include in the citation system a process for informal review of and recommendation on
 citations, including establishment of an informal citation conference conducted by a panel of independent representatives appointed by the chief. The informal citation conference panel shall consist of three members, with one representative each from the bureau, the public, and the automotive repair industry.

(3) Rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 2.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.1.

The director in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, may appoint and fix the compensation of such clerical, inspection, investigation, and auditing personnel, as well as an assistant chief, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter except as otherwise provided by Section 159.5. All such personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and the direction of the chief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.2.

The Governor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the Senate, a chief of the bureau at a salary to be fixed and determined by the director with the approval of the Director of Finance. The chief shall serve under the direction and supervision of the director and at the pleasure of the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 255, Sec. 2.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.3.

Every power granted to or duty imposed upon the director under this chapter may be exercised or performed in the name of the director by a deputy or assistant director or by the chief, subject to such conditions and limitations as the director may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.4.

The director shall keep a complete record of all registered automotive repair dealers showing the names and addresses of all such dealers. A copy of the roster shall be made available to any person requesting it upon the payment of such sum as shall be established by the chief as sufficient to cover the costs thereof. The bureau shall send to registered automotive repair dealers, at least twice a year, a newsletter which may describe recently adopted regulations, proposed regulations, disciplinary hearings, and any other information that the director shall determine will assist the bureau in its enforcement program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.5.

The director shall on his or her own initiative or in response to complaints, investigate on a continuous basis and gather evidence of violations of this chapter and of any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, by any automotive repair dealer or automotive technician, whether registered or not, and by any employee, partner, officer, or member of any automotive repair dealer. The director shall establish procedures for accepting complaints from the public against any dealer or automotive technician. The director may suggest measures that, in the director’s judgment, would compensate for any damages suffered as a result of an alleged violation. If the dealer accepts the suggestions and performs accordingly, such fact shall be given due consideration in any subsequent disciplinary proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 879, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.6.

(a) There is in the department an enforcement program that shall investigate violations of this chapter and the Motor Vehicle Inspection and Maintenance Program (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) and any regulations adopted thereunder.

(b) (1) When purchasing undercover vehicles to be used for evidentiary purposes as part of the investigation, the department may purchase motor vehicles of various makes, models, and condition. These acquisitions shall be exempt from the following requirements:

(A) Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of
 Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(B) Section 12990 of the Government Code and any applicable regulations promulgated thereunder.

(C) Subdivision (a) of Section 13332.09 of the Government Code.

(D) Section 14841 of the Government Code and subdivision (d) of Section 999.5 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(E) Sections 2010, 10286.1, 10295.1, 10295.3, 10295.35, 10296, and 12205 and Article 13 (commencing with Section 10475) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(F) Section 42480 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) After purchase, the department may prepare the vehicle for use in an investigation by disabling, modifying, or otherwise
 changing the vehicle’s emission control system components or any other part or parts of the vehicle. To complete the investigation, the department may purchase or attempt to purchase repairs, services, or parts from those entities licensed or registered by the department. The funds for the preparation and purchases shall not be subject to the monetary limit specified in Section 16404 of the Government Code, but the department shall comply with all other provisions of that section. The department shall implement the safeguards necessary to ensure the proper use and disbursement of funds utilized pursuant to this section. These expenses may be paid out of the Consumer Affairs Fund established pursuant to Section 204.

(3) Vehicles acquired pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from requirements established pursuant
 to Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 25722) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code.

(4) The department shall maintain an inventory of these vehicles and provide semiannual fleet reports to the Department of General Services, including, but not limited to, the vehicle’s identification number, equipment number, and acquisition and disposal information.

(5) Records associated with these vehicles are exempt from disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 26.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

9882.14.

(a) The bureau shall cooperate with the Office of Traffic Safety and adopt standards for the installation, maintenance, and servicing of certified ignition interlock devices by automotive repair dealers.

(b) The manufacturers of certified ignition interlock devices shall comply with standards established by the bureau for the installation of those ignition interlock devices.

(c) The bureau may charge manufacturers of certified interlock ignition devices a fee to recover the cost of monitoring installation standards.

(d) (1) The director may issue a citation to, or suspend
 or revoke the registration of, an automotive repair dealer who installs, maintains, and services ignition interlock devices if the automotive repair dealer is not in compliance with subdivision (k) of Section 23575.3 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) An automotive repair dealer shall provide to an individual receiving ignition interlock device services the information provided in subdivision (k) of Section 23575.3 of the Vehicle Code along with the contact telephone number of the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 783, Sec. 3.   (SB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration Procedure [9884. - 9884.22.]

9884.

(a) An automotive repair dealer shall pay the fee required by this chapter for each place of business operated by the dealer in this state and shall register with the director upon forms prescribed by the director.

(b) (1) The forms shall contain sufficient information to identify the automotive repair dealer, including all of the following:

(A) Name.

(B) Telephone number.

(C) Email address.

(D) Address of each
 location.

(E) A statement by the dealer that each location is in an area that, pursuant to local zoning ordinances, permits the operation of a facility for the repair of motor vehicles.

(F) The dealer’s retail seller’s permit number, if a permit is required under the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(G) Motor vehicle license plate number, if engaged in mobile automotive repairs.

(H) Other identifying data that are prescribed by the director.

(2) If the business is to be carried on under a fictitious name, the fictitious
 name shall be stated.

(3) To the extent prescribed by the director, an automotive repair dealer shall identify the owners, directors, officers, partners, members, trustees, managers, and any other persons who directly or indirectly control or conduct the business.

(4) The forms shall include any applicable nationally recognized and industry-accepted educational certifications and any bureau-accepted educational certifications.

(5) The forms shall include a statement signed by the dealer under penalty of perjury that the information provided is true.

(c) A state agency is not authorized or required by this section to enforce a city, county, regional, air
 pollution control district, or air quality management district rule or regulation regarding the site or operation of a facility that repairs motor vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 76.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.1.

Any business maintaining more than one automotive repair facility shall be permitted to file a single application annually, which along with the other information required by this article, clearly indicates the location of, and the individual in charge of, each facility. In that case, fees shall be paid for each location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 674, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.2.

Upon receipt of the form properly filled out and receipt of the required fee, the director shall issue the registration and send a proof of issuance to the automotive repair dealer. The director shall by regulation prescribe conditions that he or she determines are necessary to ensure future compliance with this chapter, upon which a person, whose registration has previously been revoked or has previously been denied or who has
 committed acts prohibited by Section 9884.7 while an automotive repair dealer or mechanic or while an employee, partner, officer or member of an automotive repair dealer, may have his or her registration issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 95.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.3.

Every registration shall cease to be valid one year from the last day of the month in which registration was issued unless the automotive repair dealer has paid the renewal fee required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 206.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.4.

A registration shall cease to be valid when the director finds that any of the information provided by the form specified in Section 9884, which the director by regulation deems material, ceases to be current.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.5.

A registration that is not renewed within three years following its expiration shall not be renewed, restored, or reinstated thereafter, and the delinquent registration shall be canceled immediately upon expiration of the three-year period.

An automotive repair dealer whose registration has been canceled by operation of this section shall obtain a new registration only if he or she again meets the requirements set forth in this chapter relating to registration, is not subject to denial under Section 480, and pays the
 applicable fees.

An expired registration may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration upon the filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the bureau and the payment of all accrued renewal and delinquency fees. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed and all renewal and delinquency fees are paid. If so renewed, the registration shall continue in effect through the expiration date of the current registration year as provided in Section 9884.3, at which time the registration shall be subject to renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 206.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.6.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to be an automotive repair dealer unless that person has registered in accordance with this chapter and unless that registration is currently valid.

(b) A person who, for compensation, adjusts, installs, or tests retrofit systems for purposes of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 44200) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code is an automotive repair dealer for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1138, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.7.

(a) The director, if the automotive repair dealer cannot show there was a bona fide error, may deny, suspend, revoke, or place on probation the registration of an automotive repair dealer for any of the following acts or omissions related to the conduct of the business of the automotive repair dealer, which are done by the automotive repair dealer or any automotive technician, employee, partner, officer, or member of the automotive repair dealer:

(1) Making or authorizing in any manner or by any means whatever any statement written or oral which is untrue or
 misleading, and which is known, or which by the exercise of reasonable care should be known, to be untrue or misleading.

(2) Causing or allowing a customer to sign any work order that does not state the repairs requested by the customer or the automobile’s odometer reading at the time of repair.

(3) Failing or refusing to give to a customer a copy of any document requiring the customer’s signature as soon as the customer signs the document.

(4) Any other conduct that constitutes fraud.

(5) Conduct constituting gross negligence.

(6) Failure in any material respect to comply with the provisions of
 this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant to it.

(7) Any willful departure from or disregard of accepted trade standards for good and workmanlike repair in any material respect, which is prejudicial to another without consent of the owner or the owner’s duly authorized representative.

(8) Making false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce a customer to authorize the repair, service, or maintenance of automobiles.

(9) Having repair work done by someone other than the dealer or the dealer’s employees without the knowledge or consent of the customer unless the dealer can demonstrate that the customer could not reasonably have been notified.

(10) Conviction of a violation of Section 551 of the Penal Code.

Upon denying a registration, the director shall notify the applicant thereof, in writing, by personal service or mail addressed to the address of the applicant set forth in the application, and the applicant shall be given a hearing under Section 9884.12 if, within 30 days thereafter, the applicant files with the bureau a written request for hearing, otherwise the denial is deemed affirmed.
